Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1,103
Consultant to department from board; authorized.

A board may designate one of its professional members to serve as a consultant to the department in reviewing complaints and on issues of professional practice that may arise during the course of an investigation. Such consultation shall not be required for the department to evaluate a complaint or to proceed with an investigation. A board may also recommend or confer with a consultant member of its profession to assist the board or department on issues of professional practice.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 103.